District of Columbia statutes.
41-139

Appropriations.

There are authorized to be appropriated such sums as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 139, 27 DCR 5150

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 42-239.